Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1006.01
Personal needs allowance; amount authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall include in the standard of need for eligible aged, blind, and disabled persons seventy-five dollars per month for a personal needs allowance if such persons reside in an alternative living arrangement.

For purposes of this section, an alternative living arrangement shall include board and room, a boarding home, a certified adult family home, a licensed assisted-living facility, a licensed residential child-caring agency as defined in section 71-1926, a licensed center for the developmentally disabled, and a long-term care facility.

Laws 1991, LB 57, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 308;

Laws 1997, LB 608, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 119, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 79;

Laws 2013, LB265, § 37;

Laws 2015, LB366, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 62.